Vermont, session 2025-2026, H397.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Division of Emergency Management; Plans and Reports * * *
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 3a is amended to read:
§ 3a. EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DIVISION; DUTIES; BUDGET
(a) In addition to other duties required by law, the Division of Emergency
Management shall:
* * *
(3) Annually on or before the last legislative day in January, provide an
update and presentation to the House Committee on Government Operations
and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations
concerning all action items in the all-hazards mitigation plan required by
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
* * *
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 41 is amended to read:
§ 41. STATE EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PLAN
The Department of Public Safety’s Vermont Division of Emergency
Management Division, in consultation with stakeholders, shall create, and
republish as needed, but not less than every five years, a comprehensive State
Emergency Management Plan. The Plan shall:
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 2 of 19
2025
(1) detail response systems during all-hazards events, including
communications, coordination among State, local, private, and volunteer
entities, and the deployment of State and federal resources. The Plan shall also;
(2) detail the State’s emergency preparedness measures and goals,
including those for the prevention of, protection against, mitigation of, and
recovery from all-hazards events. The Plan shall; and
(3) include templates and guidance for regional emergency management
and for local emergency plans that support municipalities in their respective
emergency management planning.
* * * Voluntary Buyouts * * *
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. § 48 is amended to read:
§ 48. COMMUNITY RESILIENCE AND DISASTER MITIGATION
GRANT PROGRAM
* * *
(c) Administration; implementation.
(1) Grant awards. The Department of Public Safety, in coordination
with the Department of Environmental Conservation, shall administer the
Program, which shall award grants for the following:
* * *
(C) projects that implement disaster mitigation measures, adaptation,
or repair, including watershed restoration, voluntary buyouts for flood-
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 3 of 19
2025
impacted or -prone properties, and similar activities that directly reduce risks
to communities, lives, public collections of historic value, and property; and
* * *
* * * Division of Emergency Management; Assistance to Municipalities * * *
Sec. 4. 20 V.S.A. § 51 is added to read:
§ 51. DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT; ALL-HAZARD
AND WEATHER ALERT SYSTEMS FOR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATIONS
Upon request of a municipal corporation, the Division of Emergency
Management shall assist the municipal corporation with access to the
following:
(1) a statewide river observation and modeling system that details
current river level observations and models river flood outlooks; and
(2) a statewide enhanced weather forecasting and alert system that:
(A) predicts local and regional conditions using advanced modeling;
and
(B) issues real-time warnings for potentially dangerous weather
through multiple communication channels.
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 4 of 19
2025
* * * Needs Assessment Report * * *
Sec. 5. DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT; STATE
STAKEHOLDERS; NEEDS ASSESSMENT; REPORT
The Division of Emergency Management shall conduct a needs assessment
to identify any additional staffing, resources, technical needs, or authority
needed to carry out the provisions of this act. On or before November 15,
2025, the Division shall submit a written report to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Government Operations
containing the needs assessments conducted by the State agencies and
departments identified in this section.
* * * Municipal Finances and Indebtedness * * *
Sec. 6. 24 V.S.A. § 1585 is added to read:
§ 1585. UNASSIGNED FUND BALANCE
Monies from a budget approved by the voters at an annual or special
meeting that are not expended by the end of a municipality’s fiscal year shall
be under the control and direction of the legislative body of the municipality
and may be carried forward from year to year as an unassigned fund balance.
Unassigned fund balances may be invested and reinvested as are other monies
received by a town treasurer and may be expended for any public purpose as
established by the legislative body of the municipality.
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 5 of 19
2025
Sec. 7. 24 V.S.A. § 1790 is added to read:
§ 1790. EMERGENCY BORROWING; ALL-HAZARD EVENT OR STATE
OF EMERGENCY
The legislative body of a municipality may borrow money, in the name of
the municipal corporation, by issuance of its notes or orders for the purpose of
paying expenses of the municipal corporation or for public improvements
associated with an all-hazards event or a declared state of emergency pursuant
to 20 V.S.A. chapter 1. The notes or orders shall be for a period of not more
than five years or a term not to exceed the reasonably anticipated useful life of
the improvements or assets financed by the notes or orders.
Sec. 8. 24 V.S.A. § 1759 is amended to read:
§ 1759. DENOMINATIONS; PAYMENTS; INTEREST
(a)(1) Any bond issued under this subchapter shall draw interest at a rate
not to exceed the rate approved by the voters of the municipal corporation in
accordance with section 1758 of this title, or if no rate is specified in the vote
under that section, at a rate approved by the legislative branch body of the
municipal corporation, such the interest to be payable semiannually as
determined by the legislative body of the municipal corporation. Such The
bonds or bond shall be payable serially, the first payment to be deferred not
later than from one to five years after the issuance of the bonds and subsequent
principal payments or debt service payments, which include both principal and
interest payments, to be continued annually in equal substantially level or
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 6 of 19
2025
diminishing declining amounts, as determined by the legislative body of the
municipality, so that the entire debt will be paid in not more than 20 years from
the date of issue.
(2) In the case of bonds issued for the purchase or development of a
municipal forest, the first payment may be deferred not more than 30 years
from the date of issuance thereof of the bond. Thereafter such After any
deferral period, the bonds or bond shall be payable annually in equal
substantially level or diminishing amounts declining annual debt service as the
legislative body of the municipal corporation may determine, so that the entire
debt will be paid in not more than 60 years from the date of issue.
* * *
(b) General obligation bonds authorized under this subchapter for the
purpose of financing the improvement, construction, acquisition, repair,
renovation, and replacement of a municipal plant as defined in 30 V.S.A.
§ 2901 shall be paid serially, the first payment to be deferred not later than
from one to five years after the issuance of the bonds, and subsequent principal
payments or debt service payments, which include both principal and interest
payments, to be continued annually in substantially level or declining amounts,
as determined by the legislative body of the municipal corporation, so that the
entire debt will be paid over a term equal to the useful life of the financed
improvements, but not more than 40 years from the date of issue, and may be
so arranged that beginning with the first year in which principal is payable, the
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 7 of 19
2025
amount of principal and interest in any year shall be as nearly equal as is
practicable according to the denomination in which such bonds are issued,
notwithstanding other permissible payment schedules authorized by this
section.
* * * Dam Drawdown During Emergency Flood Events * * *
Sec. 9. 20 V.S.A. § 9 is amended to read:
§ 9. EMERGENCY POWERS OF GOVERNOR
(a) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, in the event of an all-hazards
event in or directed upon the United States or Canada that causes or may cause
substantial damage or injury to persons or property within the State in any
manner, the Governor may declare a state of emergency within the entire State
or any portion or portions of the State. Thereafter, the Governor shall have and
may exercise for as long as the Governor determines the emergency to exist the
following additional powers within such the area or areas:
* * *
(b)(1) In consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee,
the Governor may authorize the Agency of Natural Resources to waive
applicable permits and restrictions under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 or the Vermont
Water Quality Standards to allow dams within the State to draw down water
levels in anticipation of a flood event that is likely to cause substantial damage
or injury to persons or property. Waivers may only be issued if the Director of
the Division of Emergency Management, in consultation with the Secretary of
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 8 of 19
2025
Natural Resources or designee, has significant reason to believe that
authorizing an advance drawdown will decrease the risk of substantial damage
to persons or property within the State. The Secretary or designee shall, to the
extent feasible, consult with applicable dam owners for federally licensed sites.
Dam operators operating under a waiver shall be required to make every effort
to minimize the environmental impact of a water level drawdown under the
authorized waiver.
(2) Dam owners authorized to use a waiver under this subsection shall
be required to develop a drawdown plan that is approved by the Secretary prior
to implementation of a drawdown. This subdivision shall not apply to dam
owners that have other plans approved by the Secretary in effect that address
emergency drawdowns. The drawdown plan shall at minimum include the
following:
(A) hydrologic and hydraulic modeling of the dam, reservoir, and
downstream channel performed by an engineer experienced in dam safety
engineering that proves the public safety benefit of pre-event drawdown;
(B) dam owner communications with downstream communities and
applicable regulators prior to and during drawdown operations;
(C) maximum safe reservoir drawdown rates and outflows, as well as
ramping rates for drawdown operations;
(D) target drawdown elevation in the reservoir;
(E) refill plan if unable to achieve during storm event;
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 9 of 19
2025
(F) monitoring and reporting requirements of drawdown operations;
and
(G) documentation of plan updates and revisions over time.
Sec. 10. [Deleted.]
* * * Local Option Tax; Amount Paid to Municipality * * *
Sec. 11. 24 V.S.A. § 138 is amended to read:
§ 138. LOCAL OPTION TAXES
* * *
(c)(1) Any tax imposed under the authority of this section shall be collected
and administered by the Department of Taxes, in accordance with State law
governing such State tax or taxes and subdivision (2) of this subsection;
provided, however, that a sales tax imposed under this section shall be
collected on each sale that is subject to the Vermont sales tax using a
destination basis for taxation. Except with respect to taxes collected on the
sale of aviation jet fuel, a per-return fee of $5.96 shall be assessed, 70 75
percent of which shall be borne by the municipality, and 30 25 percent of
which shall be borne by the State to be paid from the PILOT Special Fund.
Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 603 or any other provision of law or municipal
charter to the contrary, revenue from the fee shall be used to compensate the
Department for the costs of administering and collecting the local option tax
and of administering the State appraisal and litigation program established in
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 10 of 19
2025
32 V.S.A. § 5413. The fee shall be subject to the provisions of 32 V.S.A.
§ 605.
* * *
(d)(1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and subdivision
(2) of this subsection with respect to taxes collected on the sale of aviation jet
fuel, of the taxes collected under this section, 70 75 percent of the taxes shall
be paid on a quarterly basis to the municipality in which they were collected,
after reduction for the costs of administration and collection under subsection
(c) of this section. Revenues received by a municipality may be expended for
municipal services only, and not for education expenditures. Any remaining
revenue shall be deposited into the PILOT Special Fund established by 32
V.S.A. § 3709.
* * *
* * * Municipal Charters; Local Option Tax Revenue Share * * *
Sec. 12. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 3, § 102d is amended to read:
§ 102d. LOCAL OPTION SALES TAX AUTHORITY
The Burlington City Council is authorized to impose a one percent sales tax
upon sales within the City that are subject to the State of Vermont sales tax
with the same exemptions as the State sales tax. The City sales tax shall be
effective beginning on the next tax quarter following 30 days’ notice in 2006 to
the Department of Taxes, or shall be effective on the next tax quarter following
90 days’ notice to the Department of Taxes if notice is given in 2007 or after.
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 11 of 19
2025
Any tax imposed under the authority of this section shall be collected and
administered by the Vermont Department of Taxes in accordance with State
law governing the State sales tax. Seventy percent of the The taxes collected
shall be paid to the City, and the remaining amount of the taxes collected shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the PILOT Special Fund first
established in 1997 Acts and Resolves No. 60, Sec. 89. The cost of
administration and collection of this tax shall be paid 70 percent by the City
and 30 percent by the State from the PILOT Special Fund pursuant to 24
V.S.A. § 138. The tax to be paid to the City, less its obligation for 70 percent
of the costs of administration and collection, pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138 shall
be paid to the City on a quarterly basis and may be expended by the City for
municipal services only and not for education expenditures.
Sec. 13. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 5, § 1214 is amended to read:
§ 1214. LOCAL OPTION TAXES
Local option taxes are authorized under this section for the purpose of
affording the City an alternative method of raising municipal revenues.
Accordingly:
* * *
(3) Of the taxes reported under this section, 70 percent shall be paid to
the City for calendar years thereafter. Such revenues The City’s local option
tax revenue may be expended by the City for municipal services only and not
for educational expenditures. The remaining amount of the taxes reported
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 12 of 19
2025
shall be remitted monthly to the State Treasurer for deposit in the PILOT
Special Fund set forth in 32 V.S.A. § 3709. Taxes due to the City under this
section shall be paid by the State on a quarterly basis.
Sec. 14. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 127, § 1308a is amended to read:
§ 1308a. SALES, ROOMS, MEALS, AND ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
TAX
* * *
(d) Of the taxes collected under this section, 70 percent The share of taxes
due to the Town pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138 shall be paid to the Town on a
quarterly basis to the Town after reduction for the costs of administration and
collection under subsection (c) of this section. Revenues received by the Town
may be expended for municipal services only and not for education
expenditures. Any remaining revenues shall be deposited in the PILOT
Special Fund established by 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
Sec. 15. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 171, § 18 is amended to read:
§ 18. LOCAL OPTIONS TAX
The Selectboard is authorized to impose a one percent sales tax, a one
percent meals and alcoholic beverages tax, and a one percent rooms tax upon
sales within the Town that are subject to the State of Vermont tax on sales,
meals, alcoholic beverages, and rooms. The Town tax shall be implemented in
the event the State local options tax as provided for in 24 V.S.A. § 138 is
repealed or the 70-percent allocation to the town is reduced. A tax imposed
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 13 of 19
2025
under the authority of this section shall be collected and administered by the
Vermont Department of Taxes in accordance with State law governing the
State tax on sales, meals, alcoholic beverages, and rooms. The amount of 70
percent of the taxes collected shall be paid to the Town, and the remaining
amount of the taxes collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
deposit in the Pilot Special Fund first established in 1997 Acts and Resolves
No. 60, § 89 pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138. The cost of administration and
collection of this tax shall be paid 70 percent by the Town and 30 percent by
the State from the Pilot Special Fund pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138. The tax to
be paid to the Town, less its obligation for the 70 percent of the costs of
administration and collection, pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138 shall be paid to the
Town on a quarterly basis and may be expended by the Town for municipal
services only and not for education expenditures. The Town may repeal the
local option taxes by Australian ballot vote.
* * * Division of Emergency Management; Technical Corrections * * *
Sec. 16. 20 V.S.A. chapter 1 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 1. EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
* * *
§ 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 14 of 19
2025
(3) “Director” means the Director of Vermont the Division of
Emergency Management of the Department of Public Safety.
* * *
§ 3. VERMONT EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DIVISION
(a) There is hereby created within the Department of Public Safety a
division to the Division of Emergency Management, which may also be known
as the Vermont Emergency Management Division.
* * *
§ 4. LANGUAGE ASSISTANCE SERVICES FOR STATE EMERGENCY
COMMUNICATIONS
(a) If an all-hazards event occurs, the Vermont Emergency Management
Division shall ensure that language assistance services are available for all
State communications regarding the all-hazards event, including relevant press
conferences and emergency alerts, as soon as practicable. Language assistance
services shall be provided for:
* * *
(c) Annually, the Vermont Emergency Management Division shall hold a
public meeting with members of the Vermont Deaf, Hard of Hearing, and
DeafBlind Advisory Council; the Office of Racial Equity; the Vermont
Association of Broadcasters; and other relevant stakeholders to review the
adequacy and efficacy of the provision and distribution of language assistance
services of emergency communications over mass communication platforms to
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 15 of 19
2025
individuals who are Deaf, Hard of Hearing, and DeafBlind as well as
individuals with limited English language proficiency.
* * *
Sec. 17. 20 V.S.A. § 112 is amended to read:
§ 112. ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS — ARTICLE X
* * *
(b) The director Director of the Vermont emergency management service
Emergency Management shall be the authorized representative in regard to a
request from a party state or by Vermont for aid that does not involve
personnel or elements of the Vermont National Guard.
* * *
(d) The director Director of Vermont emergency management Emergency
Management shall be responsible for handling any and all documents
necessary to obtain reimbursement hereunder for services rendered to a
requesting state, or within Vermont by another assisting state.
* * *
Sec. 18. 10 V.S.A. § 599a is amended to read:
§ 599a. REPORTS; RULEMAKING
* * *
(c) In adopting the Strategy, the Agency shall:
* * *
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 16 of 19
2025
(2) in consultation with other State agencies and departments, including
the Department of Public Safety’s Division of Vermont Emergency
Management, assess the adaptation needs and vulnerabilities of various areas
vital to the State’s economy, normal functioning, and the health and well-being
of Vermonters;
* * *
Sec. 19. 32 V.S.A. § 3102 is amended to read:
§ 3102. CONFIDENTIALITY OF TAX RECORDS
* * *
(e) The Commissioner may, in the Commissioner’s discretion and subject
to such conditions and requirements as the Commissioner may provide,
including any confidentiality requirements of the Internal Revenue Service,
disclose a return or return information:
* * *
(24) To the Division of Vermont Emergency Management at the
Department of Public Safety for the purposes of emergency management and
communication, and to the Department of Housing and Community
Development and any organization then under contract with the Department of
Housing and Community Development to carry out a statewide housing needs
assessment for the purpose of the statewide housing needs assessment,
provided that the disclosure relates to the information collected on the landlord
certificate pursuant to subsection 6069(c) of this title.
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 17 of 19
2025
* * *
* * * Rulemaking; Federal Regulations Incorporated by Reference * * *
Sec. 20. 3 V.S.A. § 850 is added to read:
§ 850. RULES; INCORPORATION OF FEDERAL REGULATIONS
Any federal regulation incorporated by reference into a Vermont Rule as of
January 1, 2025 shall continue in effect as a State rule until January 31, 2029
or when the State rule is next amended, whichever is sooner, regardless of
whether the federal rule was later repealed or amended. The secretary of an
agency or commissioner of a department, as applicable, shall provide notice of
these incorporated regulations by posting them on the agency or department
website. Nothing in this section shall prevent the secretary or commissioner
from adopting or amending a rule pursuant to this chapter, including
emergency rulemaking.
* * * Property Tax Overpayment Refunds; City of Barre and
Town of Milton * * *
Sec. 21. GENERAL FUND TRANSFER TO THE EDUCATION FUND;
APPROPRIATION FOR COMPENSATION FOR
OVERPAYMENT
(a) In fiscal year 2026, in addition to any other fund transfers made,
$621,479.00 shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Education Fund
to compensate the City of Barre and the Town of Milton for overpayment of
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 18 of 19
2025
education property tax increment from Tax Increment Financing District funds,
pursuant to the findings of State Auditor Reports Nos. 21-03 and 24-06.
(b) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, in fiscal year 2026, $621,479.00
Education Fund shall be appropriated to the Department of Taxes for the
following:
(1) $437,028.00 to make a payment to the City of Barre to compensate
the City for overpayments of education property taxes in fiscal years 2016
through 2020 due to insufficient retention of tax increment by the City’s Tax
Increment Financing District fund; and
(2) $184,451.00 to make a payment to the Town of Milton to
compensate the Town for overpayments of education property taxes in fiscal
years 2017 through 2023 due to insufficient retention of tax increment by the
Town’s Tax Increment Financing District fund.
Sec. 22. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 72, Sec. 37 is amended to read:
Sec. 37. TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRICT; CITY OF BARRE;
EXTENSION; INCREMENT
(a) Notwithstanding 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 26a, amending
2020 Acts and Resolves No. 175, Sec. 29, or any other provision of law, the
authority of the City of Barre to incur indebtedness is hereby extended to
March 31, 2026 2028.
VT LEG #384270 v.1

No. 57 Page 19 of 19
2025
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority of the City of
Barre to retain municipal and education tax increment is hereby extended until
June 30, 2039.
Sec. 23. REPEAL
3 V.S.A. § 850 (rules; incorporation of federal regulations) is repealed on
January 31, 2029.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 24. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 20 (rules; incorporation of federal regulations)
shall take effect on passage.
(b) Sec. 11 (local option taxes) shall take effect on October 1, 2025.
(c) All other sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: June 11, 2025
VT LEG #384270 v.1